Arkansas, session 2025, HB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-13-708 is amended to read as follows:
16-13-708. Revocation of registration or license prohibited.
(a)(1) A court may shall not request in writing and under
certification that the Department of Finance and Administration revoke,
suspend, or refuse to renew the motor vehicle registration or driver's
license of a person who has failed to make satisfactory arrangements for the
payment of a court-ordered fine.
(2) However, the court shall not make a request to the
department as described under subdivision (a)(1) of this section before the
court has scheduled a hearing to address the person's nonpayment of the
court-ordered fine and the person has failed to appear at the hearing.
(3) The court may issue an order for a restricted driving permit
*ZRC035*
01/28/2025 10:38:53 AM ZRC035

HB1284
in accordance with § 27-16-916.
(b) For driver's license revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal, the
court must provide the department with the reason for the revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal, the amount the person owes the court, and the
person's full name, date of birth, and last known address.
(c) For motor vehicle registration revocation, suspension, or
nonrenewal, the court must provide the department with the reason for the
revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal, the amount the person owes the court,
and the person's full name and the license plate number or vehicle
identification number of the person's vehicle.
(d)(1) An acquittal or a dismissal of a charge of failure to pay a
fine or failure to appear at a hearing to address nonpayment of a fine that
is used as the basis to revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the person's
driver's license or motor vehicle registration shall reverse the revocation
of, suspension of, or refusal to renew the person's driver's license or motor
vehicle registration under this section.
(2) Upon an acquittal or dismissal of a charge as described in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the Office of Driver Services shall
reinstate the person's driver's license or motor vehicle registration without
charging a reinstatement fee, and the charge shall not be used to determine
the number of previous offenses when administratively revoking, suspending,
or refusing to renew the person's driver's license in the future.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-16-916(a), concerning driver's license
suspensions and the issuance of a restricted driver's license in certain
circumstances, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Unless a person is eligible for a restricted driver's license as
provided under this title, a district court may authorize a restricted
driving permit upon the suspension of a person's driver's license under § 16-
13-708 or § 16-17-131 and may permit a person whose driving privileges are
suspended to drive to and from the following:
(1) A mandatory court appearance;
(2) A program or place where a court has ordered the person's
presence or attendance;
(3) A place of employment or as required in the scope of
employment;
01/28/2025 10:38:53 AM ZRC035

HB1284
(4) A scheduled session or meeting of a support or counseling
organization;
(5) An educational institution for the purpose of attending a
class if the person is enrolled in a course of study or program of training
at the educational institution;
(6) The educational institution or childcare facility of the
person's child or children;
(7) A treatment program for persons who have addiction or abuse
problems related to a substance or controlled substances;
(8) A doctor, hospital, or clinic appointment or admission for
medical treatment or care for an illness, disease, or other medical condition
of the person or a family member;
(9) A location for the enrollment, compliance, and participation
in a specialty court program if the person is accepted into a specialty court
program; and
(10) Any other location the court finds reasonable and
necessary.



















01/28/2025 10:38:53 AM ZRC035